Washington statutes.
RCW 15.30.150

Minimum condition and maturity standards for apples.

Minimum condition and maturity standards for apples subject to the provisions of this chapter shall be the U.S. condition and maturity standards for export as provided in 7 Code of Federal Regulations 51.317 on February 21, 1961: PROVIDED, That the director may adopt any subsequent amendment to such U.S. condition and maturity standards for export prescribed by the secretary of agriculture of the United States.

[ 1961 c 29 s 15.]